Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 3.1. The Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative.

§§ 51.5-12.1 through 51.5-12.4.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Cross references.

For current definitions related to Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative, see §

51.5-178

. For current provisions related to Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Trust Fund, see §

51.5-179

; Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board, see §

51.5-180

; procudures for grant applications, see §

51.5-181

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, in enactment clauses 59 through 71, eliminated the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services, transferring powers and duties to the newly created Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. For comparable sections see §

51.5-116

et seq. Where appropriate the historical references and case notes to former provisions have been transferred to the new provisions.